Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 2. State Board of Local and Regional Jails.

§ 53.1-2.
Appointment of members; qualifications; terms and vacancies.

There shall be a State Board of Local and Regional Jails, which shall consist of nine residents of the Commonwealth appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. In making appointments the Governor shall endeavor to select appointees of such qualifications and experience that the membership of the Board shall include persons suitably qualified to consider and act upon the various matters under the Board’s jurisdiction. Members of the Board shall be appointed as follows: (i) one former sheriff or one former warden, superintendent, administrator, or operations manager of a state or local correctional facility; (ii) one individual employed by a public mental health services agency with training in or clinical, managerial, or other relevant experience working with individuals subject to the criminal justice system who have mental illness; (iii) one individual with experience overseeing a correctional facility’s or mental health facility’s compliance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations; (iv) one physician licensed in the Commonwealth; (v) one individual with experience in administering educational or vocational programs in state or local correctional facilities; (vi) one individual with experience in financial management or performing audit investigations; (vii) one citizen member who represents community interests; and (viii) two individuals with experience in conducting criminal, civil, or death investigations.

Members of the Board shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and shall be appointed for terms of four years. A vacancy other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

No person shall be eligible to serve more than two full consecutive four-year terms.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-19.23, 53-19.24; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636; 2017, c. 759; 2020, c. 759.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Board of Local and Regional Jails, formerly known as the State Board of Corrections, is continued, and wherever ‘State Board of Corrections’ is used in the Code of Virginia, it shall mean the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.”

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 4 provides: “That the standards, policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the State Board of Corrections in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 759 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759, in the Article 2 heading, substituted “Local and Regional Jails” for “Corrections”; and in the first paragraph in the first sentence, made the same change.

§ 53.1-3.
Persons ineligible for appointment.

No director, officer or employee of an institution subject to the provisions of this title shall be appointed a member of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-19.32; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-4.
Meetings; quorum; officers; main office.

The Board shall meet at least six times each calendar year and at other times as it deems appropriate. Five members of the Board shall constitute a quorum. The Board shall select a chairman and secretary from its membership. The main office of the Board shall be in Richmond.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-19.25, 53-19.29, 53-19.30, 53-19.31; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-5.
Powers and duties of Board.

The Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop and establish operational and fiscal standards governing the operation of local, regional, and community correctional facilities;

To advise the Governor and Director on matters relating to corrections;

To make, adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and other laws of the Commonwealth pertaining to local, regional, and community correctional facilities;

To ensure the development of programs to educate citizens and elicit public support for the activities of the Department;

To develop and implement policies and procedures for the review of the death of any inmate that the Board determines warrants review that occurs in any local, regional, or community correctional facility. Such policies and procedures shall incorporate the Board’s authority under §

53.1-6

to ensure the production of evidence necessary to conduct a thorough review of any such death;

To establish minimum standards for health care services, including medical, dental, pharmaceutical, and behavioral health services, in local, regional, and community correctional facilities and procedures for enforcing such minimum standards, with the advice of and guidance from the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and State Health Commissioner or their designees. Such minimum standards shall require that each local, regional, and community correctional facility submit a standardized quarterly continuous quality improvement report documenting the delivery of health care services, along with any improvements made to those services, to the Board. The Board shall make such reports available to the public on its website. The Board may determine that any local, regional, or community correctional facility that is accredited by the American Correctional Association or National Commission on Correctional Health Care meets such minimum standards solely on the basis of such facility’s accreditation status; however, without exception, the requirement that each local, regional, and community correctional facility submit a standardized quarterly continuous quality improvement report to the Board shall be a mandatory minimum standard; and

To report annually on or before December 1 to the General Assembly and the Governor on the results of the inspections and audits of local, regional, or community correctional facilities conducted pursuant to §

53.1-68

and the reviews of the deaths of inmates that occur in any local, regional, or community correctional facility conducted pursuant to §

53.1-69.1

. The report shall include (i) a summary of the results of such inspections, audits, and reviews, including any trends identified by such inspections, audits, and reviews and the frequency of violations of each standard established for local, regional, or community correctional facilities, and (ii) any recommendations for changes to the standards established for local, regional, or community correctional facilities or the policies and procedures for conducting reviews of the death of inmates to improve the operations, safety, and security of local, regional, or community correctional facilities.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-19.33, 53-19.34, 53-19.39; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1976, c. 249; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 720; 2011, c. 375; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, c. 293; 2017, c. 759; 2019, cc. 695, 696; 2020, c. 759.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 815, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The State Board of Corrections shall adopt and implement a standard to ensure the provision of feminine hygiene products to female inmates without charge.

“§ 2. The Director of the Department of Corrections shall adopt and implement a policy and procedure to ensure the provision of feminine hygiene products to female prisoners without charge.”

Acts 2019, c. 725 provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Corrections shall review its standards related to allowable restraint practices for pregnant prisoners to ensure that (i) pregnant prisoners are treated humanely and restrained in a manner that accounts for their specific health needs and (ii) such restraint procedures provide adequate protection for the safety of correctional staff and others who may be in close proximity to such prisoners.”

Acts 2020, c. 522, cl. 1 provides: “That the Board of Corrections (the Board) shall, in consultation with a stakeholder work group formed for the purpose of gathering input, conduct a review of the standards and requirements governing, and the application and use of, isolated confinement in local correctional facilities. The stakeholder work group shall comprise interested parties including at least one representative from each of the following groups: sheriffs, regional superintendents, public defenders, formerly incarcerated people, mental health experts, disability rights advocates, and civil liberties advocates. The Board shall report its findings and recommendations to the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security and the Chairs of the House Committee for Courts of Justice, the House Committee on Public Safety, the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by December 1, 2020, and publish the report on its website. The Board may thereafter promulgate standards consistent with the findings of the report on the use of isolated confinement in local correctional facilities. For purposes of this act, ‘isolated confinement’ means confinement of a prisoner to a cell, alone or with another prisoner, for 20 or more hours per day.”

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 4 provides: “That the standards, policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the State Board of Corrections in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 392 provides:

“§ 1. That the Board of Local and Regional Jails (the Board) shall conduct a review of services provided to inmates during pregnancy, pregnancy termination, labor and delivery, and postpartum recovery. In conducting such review, the Board shall (i) identify and analyze all obstetric and gynecological services and any other services provided by local and regional jails to inmates during pregnancy, pregnancy termination, labor and delivery, and postpartum recovery; (ii) compare such services to best practices recommended by the American Correctional Association, American Jail Association, National Commission on Correctional Health Care, and American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists; and (iii) develop recommendations to ensure that proper services are provided to inmates during pregnancy, pregnancy termination, labor and delivery, and postpartum recovery.

“§ 2. In the course of such review, the Board shall convene and consult with a stakeholder work group composed of the following members: representatives of the Indigent Defense Commission, Legal Aid Justice Center, Virginia Sheriffs’ Association, and Virginia Association of Regional Jails; at least one physician and one mental health professional who provides care to inmates; at least one obstetrician, one birth advocate, and one reproductive rights advocate; at least two former inmates who were pregnant or gave birth while incarcerated in a local or regional jail; and other interested stakeholders. No more than half of the work group members shall be employees of or under contract with a local or regional jail.

“The Board shall also, as necessary, consult with other relevant stakeholders and experts, including the Department of the Treasury’s Division of Risk Management.

“§ 3. Any records or information obtained from current or former inmates during such review shall be used only for purposes of conducting the review required by this act and shall be confidential and exempt from mandatory disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq. of the Code of Virginia). No report or other document generated by the Board or the work group during the review shall contain identifying information specific to any current or former inmate, local or regional jail, or prior case or complaint.

“§ 4. The Board shall report its findings and recommendations to the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services, House Committee for Courts of Justice, and House Committee on Public Safety by July 1, 2022. The Board shall post such report on its website.

“§ 5. The Board shall adopt regulations consistent with its findings and recommendations.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 375 rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and added subdivision 5 and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 293 added subdivision 6 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 759 inserted subdivision 5 and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 695 and 696 are identical, and inserted subdivision 6 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 rewrote subdivision 7, which read: “To establish and promulgate regulations regarding the provision of educational and vocational programs within the Department; and”; deleted former subdivision 8, which read: “To adopt and promulgate regulations and require the Director and Department to enforce regulations prohibiting the possession of obscene materials, as defined and described in Article 5 (§

18.2-372

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2, by prisoners incarcerated in state correctional facilities.”

§ 53.1-5.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the duty to establish regulations regarding human research, see subdivision 14 of §

53.1-10

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

53.1-5.1

, pertaining to establishing regulations regarding human research, derived from 1992, c. 603.

§ 53.1-5.2.
Compilation of certain data for redistricting purposes.

The Board shall direct the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails to provide to it, no later than May 1 of any year in which the decennial census is taken, information regarding each person incarcerated in a local or regional jail on April 1 of that year. Such information shall include, for each person incarcerated, (i) his residential street address at the time of incarceration, or other legal residence, if known; (ii) his race, his ethnicity as identified by him, and whether he is 18 years of age or older; and (iii) the street address of the correctional facility in which he was incarcerated on April 1 of that year. Upon receipt of such information, the Board shall assign to each person a unique identifier, other than his name or offender identification number.

Pursuant to §

24.2-314

, the Board shall provide to the Division of Legislative Services, not later than July 1 of any year in which the decennial census is taken and in a format specified by the Division of Legislative Services, the information specified in subsection A, including the Board-assigned unique identifier.

History.

2020, cc. 1229, 1265.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1229 and 1265, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding the deadlines set forth in §§

24.2-314

and

53.1-5.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and in §

53.1-10

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, the Board of Corrections shall direct the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails to provide to it the information required pursuant to § 53.1 -5.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by August 1, 2020; the Department of Corrections and the Board of Corrections shall provide to the Division of Legislative Services the information required pursuant to §

24.2-314

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by September 1, 2020; and the Division of Legislative Services shall require each agency operating a federal correctional facility in the Commonwealth to provide to it the information specified in § 24.2-314 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by September 1, 2020.”

§ 53.1-6.
Board may administer oaths, conduct hearings, and issue subpoenas.

The Board, in the exercise and performance of its functions, duties, and powers under the provisions of this title, is authorized to hold and conduct hearings, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, memoranda, papers, and other documents, administer oaths, and take testimony thereunder.

When a review is ordered by the Board concerning any correctional facility subject to the Board’s jurisdiction or concerning the conduct of persons connected therewith, the chairman of the Board, by order of the Board, may issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county or city in which such institution is located commanding him to summon any person to be present on a certain day at such place within such county or city as may be designated by the Board to give evidence before the Board. The Board shall have like powers to issue a summons directed to the sheriff and to direct the sheriff to enforce such summons.

The chairman of the Board shall make the entry required of the clerk by §

17.1-612

concerning the amount any witness is to be paid as if the attendance of the witness was before a court. The sum to which the witness is entitled shall be paid out of the funds appropriated to the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-19.36; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759, in the first paragraph, inserted “The” at the beginning and substituted “administer oaths, and take” for “to administer oaths and to take”; added the second and third paragraphs; and made stylistic changes.

§ 53.1-6.1.
Executive director; staff; compensation.

The Board may appoint and employ an executive director and such other persons as it deems necessary to assist it in carrying out its duties. The Board may determine the duties of such staff and fix their salaries or compensation within the amounts appropriate therefor. The duties of the executive director shall include management of (i) inspections and audits of local, regional, or community correctional facilities conducted pursuant to §

53.1-68

and (ii) reviews of the deaths of inmates that occur in any local, regional, or community correctional facility conducted pursuant to §

53.1-69.1

.

History.

2020, c. 759.

§ 53.1-7.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 375, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

53.1-7

, pertaining to the board’s authority to authorize payment of certain medical expenses incurred by a prisoner after release, derived from Code 1950, § 53-19.36:1; 1976, c. 397; 1982, c. 636.